Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 7

Tennessee Corrections Institute

41-7-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of control of the Tennessee corrections institute;

“Correctional personnel” means all correctional officers, dormitory supervisor counselors, both adult and juvenile, and chaplains employed in municipal, county and metropolitan jurisdictions; and

“Institute” means the Tennessee corrections institute.

Acts 1974, ch. 733, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-2101; Acts 1984, ch. 938, § 3.

Cross-References. Counselors at educational and correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

41-7-102. Institute created.

There is hereby created the Tennessee corrections institute.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Acts 1974, ch. 733, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-2102; Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 7; 2019, ch. 143, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted former (b) which read: “The Tennessee corrections institute shall be attached to the department of commerce and insurance, and the department shall serve as a fiscal agent for the institute.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 143, § 3. July 1, 2019.

41-7-103. Purposes and duties.

The Tennessee corrections institute shall:

Train correctional personnel in the methods of delivering correctional services in municipal, county and metropolitan jurisdictions;

Evaluate correctional programs in municipal, county and metropolitan jurisdictions. At the request of the commissioner of correction, the institute may also evaluate state correctional programs;

Conduct studies and research in the area of corrections and criminal justice in order to make recommendations to the governor, the commissioner of correction and the general assembly; and

Inspect all local penal institutions, jails, workhouses or any other local correctional facility in accordance with § 41-4-140.

Acts 1974, ch. 733, § 3; 1980, ch. 913, § 7; T.C.A., § 41-2103; Acts 1984, ch. 938, §§ 4-7; 1996, ch. 1079, § 138.

Cross-References. Qualification and training of correction officers, § 41-1-116.

41-7-104. Students eligible — Fees.

In addition to correctional personnel from other jurisdictions within the state, students pursuing a degree with a major in any field within the area of criminal justice in a college or university of this state should also be eligible for enrollment and training at the institute, the same as if they were correctional personnel.

The institute may charge reasonable fees to cover costs of any food, lodging, instrumental materials, equipment or services furnished to trainees, as may be established by the board.

A fee of ten cents (10¢) shall be collected for each completed telephone call made by an inmate housed in a local jail or workhouse. Such fees shall be remitted by the telephone service provider to the state treasurer each quarter and credited to a special account in the state general fund designated as the local correctional officer training fund to be used exclusively to fund certification training provided through the institute for local correctional personnel within the state. The institute’s board of control shall approve all expenditures from the fund. Funds deposited in the account shall not revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year. On or before February 1, 2013, and by February 1 of each subsequent year, the institute shall report to the chairs of the state and local government and finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the local government and finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives on the fund’s reserves and expenditures, which report shall include at least the following information for the prior calendar year:

The amount of available reserves;

The amount of expenditures made from the fund; and

The manner of making such expenditures.

Acts 1974, ch. 733, § 6; T.C.A., § 41-2104; Acts 1984, ch. 938, § 8; 2012, ch. 972, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 73.

Cross-References. Qualifications of correction officers, § 41-1-116.

41-7-105. Board of control.

The correctional services programs of the institute shall be under the direction of the board of control of the institute. The board of control shall consist of seven (7) members:

The governor or the governor's designee;

The commissioner of correction or the commissioner's designee;

The chair of the department of criminal justice of an institution of higher education in Tennessee, who shall be appointed by the governor;

Two (2) sheriffs, who shall be appointed by the governor. One (1) shall be from a county with a population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more and one (1) shall be from a county with a population of less than two hundred thousand (200,000);

A county mayor, who shall be appointed by the governor; and

A chief of police or a county commissioner, who shall be appointed by the governor.

The initial term of members of the board shall be three (3) years, beginning on October 1, 2012. Successors shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years. Members shall continue to serve until their successors are appointed. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a successor for the unexpired term.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1974, ch. 733, § 4; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(34); T.C.A., § 41-2105; Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee corrections institute, board of control, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-245.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

41-7-106. Powers of board.

The board is authorized to enter into a contract or contracts with state, local, municipal, county or metropolitan correctional and criminal justice officials as may be necessary in order to carry out title 40, chapter 28, this chapter and chapter 21 of this title. In addition, the board has the power to contract with appropriate officials in other states who wish to utilize the services of the institute. The power to contract shall include the power to contract with public agencies or officials for enrolling trainees in general courses or establishing special courses and study projects designed to meet the needs of agencies or units of government.

The board is authorized to accept and expend local, federal or foundation funds, contributions or grants as may be received and allotted for the purposes of this chapter.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation and the effective operation of this chapter.

The board has the right and power to call on the office of the attorney general and reporter for any necessary legal representation or assistance.

The board may authorize its executive director or other official of the institute to execute contracts and take such other actions as it may specify from time to time.

The board is empowered to and shall establish criteria for determining whether to waive the minimum qualifications required to be a jail administrator, workhouse administrator, jailer, corrections officer, or guard in a county jail or workhouse, as provided in § 41-4-144.

The board shall not grant waivers for any person hired as a jail administrator, workhouse administrator, jailer, corrections officer, or guard in any county jail or workhouse who has been dishonorably discharged from the military, has any mental impairment which affects the person's ability to perform any essential function of the job with or without a reasonable accommodation, has a conviction for domestic assault or a felony conviction.

The board's decision to grant waivers under subsection (f) shall be appealable to the chancery court.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement subsection (f).

Acts 1974, ch. 733, § 5; 1976, ch. 386, § 1; 1979, ch. 133, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-2106; Acts 1984, ch. 938, § 9; 2012, ch. 930, § 1; 2012, ch. 986, § 8; 2013, ch. 173, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 930, § 1 added subsections (f)-(g), effective May 10, 2012. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 8 rewrote the section, effective October 1, 2012. The subsections added by Acts 2012, ch. 930, § 1 remain in effect after the section was rewritten by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 8, pursuant to the apparent intent of the legislature.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

41-7-107. Authority to acquire site and construct building — Interim facilities furnished by state universities.

The state building commission is authorized and empowered to acquire a site or sites to construct a suitable building or buildings for conducting the programs of the institute. The commission may accept from any agency or department of state or local government a site or building by gift, donation or loan and in that event, may expend any capital outlay funds available for the restoration, renovation, repair and equipping of the facility.

Until a facility is constructed or acquired, the institute shall conduct its programs in facilities furnished by Tennessee State University or Middle Tennessee State University.

Acts 1974, ch. 733, § 8; T.C.A., § 41-2108.

41-7-108. Technical and programmatic assistance — Inspections.

At the request of the commissioner of correction, the institute may provide the department of correction with technical and programmatic assistance, including inspections of state facilities. The institute shall provide the department with a report concerning the deficiencies or departures from standards found as the result of the inspection.

Acts 1984, ch. 938, § 10.

41-7-109. Executive director of the board.

The board shall hire an executive director as its duly appointed representative to perform all administrative functions for the board. The person selected to become executive director must be approved by majority vote of the board prior to serving in the position.

The executive director is authorized to employ such personnel as may reasonably be required in accordance with the statutes and procedures administered by the departments of finance and administration and human resources; provided, that an offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a criminal history background check and investigation conducted as follows:

Immediately upon a prospective employee's acceptance of an offer of employment, the executive director or the director's designee, shall submit the prospective employee's name or names to the Tennessee bureau of investigation;

A prospective employee shall supply a fingerprint sample upon request, in the manner requested by the investigating entity; and

The Tennessee bureau of investigation, pursuant to § 38-6-109, shall conduct a criminal history background check and investigation on a prospective employee as soon as practicable after the submission of the prospective employee's name or names by the executive director or the director's designee.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation may contract with the federal bureau of investigation, other law enforcement agencies, or any other legally authorized entity to assist in such criminal history background check and investigation.

The institute shall pay, as an operating expense, the cost of the criminal history background check.

The results of such a criminal history background check shall not be considered a record open to the public, pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 9; 2014, ch. 584, § 1; 2019, ch. 143, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall hire the executive director of the board. The executive director shall perform all administrative functions for the board.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 143, § 3. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.